Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-1,136
Action to enjoin and enforce compliance.

Whenever it appears to the director that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of Chapter 8 or the Credit Union Act, he or she may bring an action in the name of the director and the department in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any such acts or practices and to enforce compliance with the provisions of Chapter 8 or the Credit Union Act. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandamus shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant's assets. The director shall not be required to post a bond.

Laws 1984, LB 1039, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 908, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 119;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 126.

Credit Union Act, see section 21-1701.